District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Consumer Levies on Obstructive Garbage Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Chapter 20 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-2001 is amended by adding a new subsection (h-4) to read as
follows:
“(h-4) “Nonwoven disposable product” means a product constructed from
nonwoven sheets, including moist toilet tissue or cloth, that is designed, marketed, or commonly
used for personal hygiene purposes, including products advertised or labeled as safe to flush, safe
for sewer systems, or safe for septic systems; except, that this definition shall not include

products intended for cleansing infants or young children and that are not advertised or labeled
as safe to flush, safe for sewer systems, or safe for septic systems.”.
(2) Section 47-2002(a) is amended by adding a new paragraph (10) to read as
follows:
“(10) The rate of tax shall be 15% of the gross receipts from the sale of or charges
for nonwoven disposable products, which shall be dedicated to the District of Columbia Water
and Sewer Authority capital improvements plan for sewer infrastructure improvement projects
beginning on October 1, 2026.”
(3) Section 47-2005 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(A) Paragraph (41) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (42)(B)(ii) is amended by striking the period and inserting
the phrase “; and” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (43) is added to read as follows:
“(43)(A) Sales of bidets
“(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “bidet” means a
bathroom fixture, freestanding or attached to a standard toilet, which provides a water stream for
cleaning the anal and genital areas.”.
(b) Chapter 22 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-2201(a)(1) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (Q) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.

(B) Subparagraph (R) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; or” in its place.
(C) A new subparagraph (S) to read as follows:
“(S) The sale of or charges for a nonwoven disposable product as defined
in § 47-2001(h-4).”
(2) Section 47-2202(a) is amended as follows:
(A) The second paragraph (6) is redesignated as paragraph (7).
(B) A paragraph (8) is added to read as follows:
“(8)(A) The rate of tax shall be 15% of the gross receipts from the sale of or
charges for nonwoven disposable products as defined in § 47-2001(h-4).
“(B) For fiscal years beginning after September 30, 2026, the proceeds of
the tax collected under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be directed to the District of
Columbia Water and Sewer Authority capital improvements plan for sewer infrastructure
improvement projects.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).